Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 15

Legal Department

4-3-1501. Creation.

There is hereby created the legal department.

Acts 1929, ch. 22, § 1; Code 1932, § 9950; modified.

Cross-References. Creation of administrative departments and divisions, §4-3-101.

4-3-1502. Attorney general and reporter.

The legal department shall be under the charge and general supervision of the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1929, ch. 22, § 1; Code 1932, § 9950; modified.

Cross-References. Attorney general and reporter as constitutional officer, appointment, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 5.

4-3-1503. Powers and duties.

The attorney general and reporter and the attorney general and reporter's assistants shall constitute the legal department, which has the powers and duties specified in title 8, chapter 6.

Acts 1929, ch. 22, § 1; Code 1932, § 9950; modified.